Massachusetts, session 194th, S666.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The Massachusetts Pesticide Board, in consultation with the State Reclamation and 
Mosquito Control Board, is hereby authorized and directed to provide by regulation for 
alternative means by which private property may be designated for exclusion from wide area 
applications of pesticides and mosquito control applications of pesticides approved by the State 
Reclamation and Mosquito Control Board under 333 CMR 13.03, in lieu of the submission of a 
certified letter to the clerk of the municipality in which the property is located.  Said alternatives 
shall include, but need not be limited to (i) allowing municipalities to include an “opt out” 
provision on their annual city or town census forms by which residents can elect to exclude their 
property from such applications of pesticides, and (ii) allowing residents to submit a hand-
delivered letter to the municipal clerk that includes the name, address and telephone number (if 
any) of the person requesting the exclusion, the address of the property to be excluded, and a 

of 2 12 description of the types of pesticide application programs for which exclusion in requested.  Said 
changes to 333 CMR 13.03 shall be implemented at least 90 days in advance of the 
commencement of the 2026 pesticide spraying season.